District of Columbia statutes.
31-3414

Enrollment period; replacement coverage in the event of insolvency.

(a)

Enrollment period. —

(1)

In the event of the insolvency of a health maintenance organization, upon order of the Commissioner all other carriers that participated in the enrollment process with the insolvent health maintenance organization at a group’s last regular enrollment period shall offer such group’s enrollees of the insolvent health maintenance organization a 30-day enrollment period commencing upon the date of insolvency. Each carrier shall offer such enrollees of the insolvent health maintenance organization the same coverages and rates that it had offered to the enrollees of the group at its last regular enrollment period.

(2)

If no other carrier has been offered to groups enrolled in the insolvent health maintenance organization or if the Commissioner determines that the other health benefit plans lack sufficient health care delivery resources to assure that health care services will be available and accessible to all of the group enrollees of the insolvent health maintenance organization, then the Commissioner shall allocate equitably the insolvent health maintenance organization’s group contracts for such groups among all health maintenance organizations which operate within a portion of the insolvent health maintenance organization’s service area, taking into consideration the health care delivery resources of each health maintenance organization. Each health maintenance organization to which a group or groups are so allocated shall offer such group or groups the health maintenance organization’s existing coverage which is most similar to each group’s coverage with the insolvent health maintenance organization at rates determined in accordance with the successor health maintenance organization’s existing rating methodology.

(3)

The Commissioner shall also allocate equitably the insolvent health maintenance organization’s nongroup enrollees which are unable to obtain other coverage among all health maintenance organizations which operate within a portion of the insolvent health maintenance organization’s service area, taking into consideration the health care delivery resources of each such health maintenance organization. Each health maintenance organization to which nongroup enrollees are allocated shall offer nongroup enrollees the health maintenance organization’s existing coverage for individual or conversion coverage as determined by this type of coverage in the insolvent health maintenance organization’s existing rating methodology. Successor health maintenance organizations which do not offer direct nongroup enrollment may aggregate all of the allocated nongroup enrollees into one group for rating and coverage purposes.

(b)

Replacement coverage. —

(1)

For the purposes of this subsection, the term “discontinuance” means the termination of the contract between the group contract holder and a health maintenance organization due to the insolvency of the health maintenance organization and does not refer to the termination of any agreement between any individual enrollee and the health maintenance organization.

(2)

Any carrier providing replacement coverage with respect to group hospital, medical or surgical expense or service benefits within a period of 60 days from the date of discontinuance of a prior health maintenance organization contract or policy providing such hospital, medical, or surgical expense or service benefits shall immediately cover all enrollees who were validly covered under the previous health maintenance organization contract or policy at the date of discontinuance and who would otherwise be eligible for coverage under the succeeding carrier’s contract, regardless of any provisions of the contract relating to active employment or hospital confinement or pregnancy.

(3)

Except to the extent benefits for the condition would have been reduced or excluded under the prior carrier’s contract or policy, no provision in a succeeding carrier’s contract of replacement coverage which would operate to reduce or exclude benefits on the basis that the condition giving rise to benefits preexisted the effective date of the succeeding carrier’s contract shall be applied with respect to those enrollees validly covered under the prior carrier’s contract or policy on the date of discontinuance.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-235, § 15, 44 DCR 818
This section is referenced in § 31-3152, § 31-3403, and § 31-3430.
1981 Ed., § 35-4514.